Hawaii statutes.
[§161-24] Sanitation. The board shall
cause to be made by veterinarians or poultry inspectors, an inspection of the
sanitary conditions of all poultry slaughtering, poultry-canning, packing, or
similar establishments in which poultry are slaughtered and the poultry or
poultry products thereof are processed solely for intrastate commerce and to
prescribe the rules and regulations of sanitation under which such
establishments shall be maintained; and where the sanitary conditions of any
such establishment are such that the poultry or poultry products are rendered
adulterated, it shall refuse to allow the poultry or poultry products to be
labeled, marked, stamped, or tagged as "Hawaii Inspected and Passed".
[L 1969, c 212, §16]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next